Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 94
COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT FORT LOGAN

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2010 containing provisions of article 15 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

27-94-101. Legislative declaration.

In order to provide a program to promote mental health in the state of Colorado, a mental health center is established as provided in this article.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 775, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-15-101 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-94-102. Establishment of mental health center.

There is hereby established at the site of Fort Logan, Denver county, Colorado, a mental health center to be known as the Colorado mental health institute at Fort Logan, referred to in this article as the "center". The center shall be under the general supervision and control of the department of human services.

All materials without limitation that contain the former names of the Colorado mental health institute at Fort Logan and the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo shall be utilized to the maximum extent possible in the ordinary course of business before being replaced.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 775, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-15-102 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-94-103. Employees - adult protective services data system check - publications.

The head of the administrative division overseeing the center shall appoint or employ, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, administrators, physicians, nurses, attendants, and additional employees as necessary for the proper conduct of the center. The head of the administrative division may contract with the board of regents of the university of Colorado health sciences center for the provision of services by physicians when deemed necessary for the proper conduct of the center, and during the performance of any duties by the physicians for the department of human services, the physicians are "public employees" as defined in section 24-10-103 (4), C.R.S., and the limitation of section 24-30-1517 (2), C.R.S., shall not apply.

(1.5) On and after January 1, 2019, the head of the administrative division overseeing the center shall, prior to employment, submit the name of a person who will be providing direct care, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (3.5), to an at-risk adult, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (1.5), as well as any other required identifying information, to the department of human services for a check of the Colorado adult protective services data system pursuant to section 26-3.1-111 to determine if the person is substantiated in a case of mistreatment of an at-risk adult.

Publications of the center circulated in quantity outside the center shall be subject to the approval and control of the executive director of the department of human services.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 776, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1.5) added, (HB 17-1284), ch. 272, p. 1506, § 16, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-15-103 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-94-104. Capacity to take property.

The center is authorized to receive gifts, legacies, devises, and conveyances of property, real and personal, that may be granted or given to the center. The executive director of the department of human services, with the approval of the governor, shall make disposition of such property as may be for the best interest of said center.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 776, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-15-104 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-94-105. Admissions to center - transfers - releases.

A person who by law is committed to the department of human services for placement in a state hospital may be committed to or placed in the center upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction, except those persons committed to the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo pursuant to a judicial determination of not guilty by reason of insanity and those persons committed under section 16-8-106 (1), C.R.S., relating to commitments for observation and examination.

A person placed at the center may be transferred to the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo, the Wheat Ridge regional center, the Grand Junction regional center, the Pueblo regional center, the Mount View school, or the Lookout Mountain school in accordance with law.

A person placed at the center may be released under such terms and conditions as would entitle him or her to his or her release from the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 776, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-15-105 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-94-106. Access to inpatient civil beds at center.

The department shall develop and implement admission criteria that ensures individuals, prior to being admitted, have been evaluated for the least restrictive level of care and that geographic location, current health care provider, and payer type are not the primary determining factor in whether an individual has access to a civil inpatient bed.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-222), ch. 226, p. 2266, § 5, effective May 20.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-222, see section 1 of chapter 226, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

27-94-107. Renovation for additional beds.

The department of human services shall renovate a building at the center to add at least sixteen inpatient beds. The department shall spend or obligate all money appropriated for the renovation by December 30, 2024. Any money obligated by December 30, 2024, must be expended by December 30, 2026.

Initially, the beds may be used for persons needing competency services. When the wait list for competency services provided pursuant to section 16-8.5-111 is eliminated or trending so that it can be reasonably expected to be eliminated within one year, the department of human services shall implement a plan to transition the beds created in subsection (1) of this section to serve civil patients and immediately notify the joint budget committee of the general assembly. Within one year after the notification to the joint budget committee, all beds created pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must serve civil patients.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1303), ch. 183, p. 1221, § 2, effective May 18.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1303, see section 1 of chapter 183, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.